Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 20269-1205
Tax; report.

Every authorized gaming operator subject to taxation as set forth in section 9-1203 shall pay such tax by the fifteenth of each month to the commission and make report thereof to the commission under such rules and regulations as may be prescribed by the commission.

Initiative Law 2020, No. 431, § 5;

Laws 2021, LB561, § 43;

Laws 2022, LB876, § 22;

Laws 2025, LB357, § 19.